District of Columbia statutes.
22-3010

Enticing a child or minor.

(a)

Whoever, being at least 4 years older than a child or being in a significant relationship with a minor, (1) takes that child or minor to any place for the purpose of committing any offense set forth in §§ 22-3002 to 22-3006 and §§ 22-3008 to 22-3009.02, or (2) seduces, entices, allures, convinces, or persuades or attempts to seduce, entice, allure, convince, or persuade a child or minor to engage in a sexual act or contact shall be imprisoned for not more than 5 years or may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(b)

Whoever, being at least 4 years older than the purported age of a person who represents himself or herself to be a child, attempts (1) to seduce, entice, allure, convince, or persuade any person who represents himself or herself to be a child to engage in a sexual act or contact, or (2) to entice, allure, convince, or persuade any person who represents himself or herself to be a child to go to any place for the purpose of engaging in a sexual act or contact shall be imprisoned for not more than 5 years or may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(c)

No person shall be consecutively sentenced for enticing a child or minor to engage in a sexual act or sexual contact under subsection (a)(2) of this section and engaging in that sexual act or sexual contact with that child or minor, provided, that the enticement occurred closely associated in time with the sexual act or sexual contact.

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 209, 42 DCR 53
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 216(d), 53 DCR 8610
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 173(b), 56 DCR 1117
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 232(l), 60 DCR 2064
Sentencing, supervised release, and good time credit for felonies under this section committed on or after August 5, 2000, see § 24-403.01.
This section is referenced in § 23-113 and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-4110.
D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Whoever, being at least 4 years older than a child, takes that child to any place, or entices, allures, or persuades a child to go to any place for the purpose of committing any offense set forth in §§ 22-3002 to 22-3006 and §§ 22-3008 and 22-3009 shall be imprisoned for not more than 5 years and, in addition, may be fined in an amount not to exceed $50,000.”
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (a).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “in an amount not to exceed $50,000” in (a) and (b).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 232(l) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.